Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.150

Interagency, multijurisdictional system improvement team. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1064.SL) ***

(1) An interagency, multijurisdictional system improvement team must identify, implement, and report on system improvements that achieve the designated outcomes, including:

(a) Projects that maximize value, minimize overall costs and disturbance to the community, and ensure long-term durability and resilience;

(b) Projects that are designed to meet the unique needs of each community, rather than the needs of particular funding programs;

(c) Project designs that maximize long-term value by fully considering and responding to anticipated long-term environmental, technological, economic and population changes;

(d) The flexibility to innovate, including utilizing natural systems, addressing multiple regulatory drivers, and forming regional partnerships;

(e) The ability to plan and collaborate across programs and jurisdictions so that different investments are packaged to be complementary, timely, and responsive to economic and community opportunities;

(f) The needed capacity for communities, appropriate to their unique financial, planning, and management capacities, so they can design, finance, and build projects that best meet their long-term needs and minimize costs;

(g) Optimal use and leveraging of federal and private infrastructure dollars; and

(h) Mechanisms to ensure periodic, systemwide review and ongoing achievement of the designated outcomes.

(2) The system improvement team must consist of representatives of state infrastructure programs that provide funding for drinking water, wastewater, stormwater, and broadband programs, including but not limited to representatives from the public works board, department of ecology, department of health, and the department of commerce. The system improvement team may invite representatives of other infrastructure programs, such as transportation, energy, and broadband, as needed in order to achieve efficiency, minimize costs, and maximize value across infrastructure programs. The system improvement team shall also consist of representatives of users of those programs, representatives of infrastructure project builders, and other parties the system improvement team determines would contribute to achieving the desired outcomes, including but not limited to representatives from a state association of cities, a state association of counties, a state association of public utility districts, a state association of water and sewer districts, a state association of general contractors, and a state organization representing building trades. The public works board, a representative from the department of ecology, department of health, and department of commerce shall facilitate the work of the system improvement team.

(3) The system improvement team must focus on achieving the designated outcomes within existing program structures and authorities. The system improvement team shall use lean practices to achieve the designated outcomes.

(4) The system improvement team shall provide briefings as requested to the public works board on the current state of infrastructure programs to build an understanding of the infrastructure investment program landscape and the interplay of its component parts.

(5) If the system improvement team encounters statutory or regulatory barriers to system improvements, the system improvement team must inform the public works board and consult on possible solutions. When achieving the designated outcomes would be best served through changes in program structures or authorities, the system improvement team must report those findings to the public works board.

(6) By September 1, 2022, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the system improvement team must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes the following:

(a) A list of all projects funded by members of the system improvement team;

(b) A description of the coordination the system improvement team has completed with other grant programs and funds leveraged; and

(c) A description of regional planning that has occurred.

(7) This section expires June 30, 2025.

[2021 c 332 s 7033; 2021 c 190 s 1. Prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 11.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2021 c 190 s 1 and by 2021 c 332 s 7033, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.